Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202621-188
Certificate of registration; suspension or revocation; procedure; notice.

A regulatory body may, upon a form prescribed by it, suspend or revoke any certificate of registration issued to any limited liability company pursuant to subsection (1) of section 21-186 upon the suspension or revocation of the license or other authorization to render a professional service by any member, manager, professional employee, or agent of the limited liability company who is required by law to be licensed or otherwise authorized to render the professional service for which the limited liability company is organized to do business or a service ancillary to those which the limited liability company renders. Notice of such suspension or revocation shall be provided to the limited liability company affected by sending by certified or registered mail a certified copy of such suspension or revocation to the limited liability company at its principal place of business set forth in the certificate so suspended or revoked. At the same time, the regulatory body shall forward by regular mail a certified copy of such suspension or revocation to the Secretary of State who shall remove the suspended or revoked registration certificate from his or her files and deliver it to the regulatory body.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 88;

Laws 2024, LB628, § 4.